Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2017 Act, “state  agency” means every state
officer, board, commission, department, institution, branch or agency of the state govern-
ment, the costs of which are paid wholly or in part from funds held in the State Treasury.
SECTION 2.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 291.232 to 291.260, and subject to  section 5 of this
2017 Act and  any rule that may be adopted by the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services, any obligations incurred by a state agency on or after July 1, 2017, that do not ex-
ceed the level  of expenditures authorized under ORS 291.232 to 291.260 or otherwise author-
ized for the last quarter of the  2015-2017 biennium are authorized, and necessary funds are
appropriated therefor, unless the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services determines
that the state agency’s expenditure level should be modified, based on pending legislation.
(2) The Oregon Department of Administrative  Services by rule shall specify the means
whereby funds expended pursuant to subsection (1) of this section or section  5 of this 2017
Act are reconciled and charged  to the state agency’s 2017-2019 legislatively approved budget
during the 2017-2019 biennium.
(3) All payments for debt service, certificates of participation and other financing agree-
ments are hereby authorized during the period commencing July 1, 2017.
SECTION 3.
Sections 1 to 5 of this 2017 Act apply to a state agency for which no budget
has become law on or before July 1, 2017.
SECTION 4. (1)(a) If there is no 2017-2019 legislatively adopted budget upon final
adjournment of the regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly against  which
any expenditure authorized by section 2 (1)  or 5 of this 2017 Act can be applied, the expend-
iture shall be considered to have been made from  funds appropriated to the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services.
(b) For the purpose  of paying the incurred expenses of state agencies, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services any  cash or other funds remain-
ing in the accounts of the state agency for which no budget has been adopted and for  which
no expenditure authority exists when the Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
(c) The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services may apply for reimbursement
from the Emergency Board of any expenditure made  under this subsection during the
2017-2019 biennium.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5544 (SB 5544-A) Page 1
(2)(a) If, after final adjournment of  the regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative
Assembly, the Governor vetoes a legislatively adopted budget against which any expenditure
authorized by section 2 (1) or 5 of this 2017 Act can be  applied, the expenditure shall be
considered to have been made from funds appropriated to the Oregon Department of  Ad-
ministrative Services.
(b) For the purpose  of paying the incurred expenses of state agencies, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services any  cash or other funds remain-
ing in the accounts of the state agency for  which a legislatively adopted budget has been
vetoed and for which no expenditure authority exists when the Governor vetoes the budget.
(c) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services  may apply for reimbursement
from the Emergency Board of any  expenditure made under this subsection during the
2017-2019 biennium.
SECTION 5.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 291.232 to 291.260 and section 2 of this 2017 Act,
and subject to any rule that may  be adopted by the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services, any obligations incurred by the Department of Human Services  on or after July 1,
2017, that do not exceed the level of expenditures authorized under ORS 291.232  to 291.260
or otherwise authorized for the seventh quarter of the 2015-2017 biennium are  authorized,
and necessary funds are  appropriated therefor, unless the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services determines that the expenditure level for the Department of Human Services
should be modified, based on pending legislation.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 291.232 to 291.260 and section 2  of this 2017 Act, and subject to
any rule that may be adopted by the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, any
obligations incurred by the Oregon Health Authority on or after  July 1, 2017, that do not
exceed the level of expenditures authorized  under ORS 291.232 to 291.260 or otherwise au-
thorized for the seventh quarter of the 2015-2017 biennium are  authorized, and necessary
funds are appropriated therefor,  unless the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
determines that the expenditure level for the Oregon Health Authority should be modified,
based on pending legislation.
SECTION 6.
Sections 1 to 5 of this 2017 Act are repealed on September 15, 2017.
SECTION 7. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5544 (SB 5544-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 19, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5544 (SB 5544-A) Page 3